Vermont, session 2025-2026, H245.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 9375 is amended to read:
§ 9375. DUTIES
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 2 of 15
(a) The Board shall execute its duties consistent with the principles
expressed in section 9371 of this title.
(b) The Board shall have the following duties:
* * *
(7) Review and establish hospital budgets for hospitals and health
networks pursuant to chapter 221, subchapter 7 of this title.
* * *
(16)(A) Investigate whether, in the event that a hospital or health
network maintains a horizontal or vertical monopoly or significant market
power in any health care sector in this State, the public good would be
promoted by eliminating or reducing the monopoly or significant market
power. If the investigation indicates that the public good would be promoted,
the Board shall take such actions that are within its authority as are necessary
or desirable to eliminate or reduce the monopoly or significant market power
and shall recommend to the General Assembly any legislation needed to
authorize actions that are outside the Board’s existing authority.
(B) The Board may contract with one or more outside entities as
needed to enable the Board to conduct an investigation pursuant to subdivision
(A) of this subdivision (16) and may assess the applicable hospital or health
network for the amount of the Board’s actual expenses incurred in conducting
the investigation.
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 3 of 15
* * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9376 is amended to read:
§ 9376. PAYMENT AMOUNTS; METHODS
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure payments to health
care professionals that are consistent with efficiency, economy, and quality of
care and; that will permit them to provide, on a solvent basis, effective and
efficient health services that are in the public interest; and that are affordable
and will reduce cost increase trends to an appropriate level within a reasonable
period of time. It is also the intent of the General Assembly to eliminate the
shift of costs between the payers of health services to ensure that the amount
paid to health care professionals is sufficient to enlist enough providers to
ensure that health services are available to all Vermonters and are distributed
equitably.
* * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. chapter 221, subchapter 7 is amended to read:
Subchapter 7. Hospital Budget Review
§ 9451. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Hospital” means a hospital licensed under chapter 43 of this title,
except a hospital that is conducted, maintained, or operated by the State of
Vermont.
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 4 of 15
(2) “Volume” means the number of inpatient days of care or admissions
and the number of all inpatient and outpatient ancillary services rendered to
patients by a hospital.
(3) “Health network” means a system comprising two or more affiliated
hospitals, and may include other health care providers and facilities, that
deliver health care services in a coordinated manner using an integrated
financial and governance structure.
§ 9453. POWERS AND DUTIES
(a) The Board shall:
(1) adopt uniform formats that hospitals and health networks shall use to
report financial, scope-of-services, and utilization data and information;
(2) designate a data organization with which hospitals and health
networks shall file financial, scope-of-services, and utilization data and
information; and
(3) designate a data organization or organizations to process, analyze,
store, or retrieve data or information; and
(4) designate one accounting entity and methodology to construct
financials and budget submissions for all hospitals and health systems, unless
the Board determines that an equally effective and efficient entity and
methodology is appropriate.
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 5 of 15
(b) To effectuate the purposes of this subchapter, the Board may adopt
rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
§ 9454. HOSPITALS AND HEALTH NETWORKS; DUTIES
(a) Hospitals and health networks shall file the following information at the
time and place and in the manner established by the Board:
(1) a budget for the forthcoming fiscal year;
(2) financial information, including costs of operation, revenues, assets,
liabilities, fund balances, other income, rates, charges, units of services, and
wage and salary data;
(3) scope-of-service and volume-of-service information, including
inpatient services, outpatient services, and ancillary services by type of service
provided;
(4) utilization information;
(5) new hospital or health network services and programs proposed for
the forthcoming fiscal year;
(6) known depreciation schedules on existing buildings, a four-year
capital expenditure projection, and a one-year capital expenditure plan; and
(7) such other information as the Board may require.
(b) Hospitals and health networks shall adopt a fiscal year that shall begin
on October 1.
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 6 of 15
(c) Hospitals and health networks shall use the accounting entity and
methodology designated by the Board pursuant to subdivision 9453(a)(4) of
this chapter.
§ 9456. BUDGET REVIEW
(a)(1) The Board shall conduct reviews of each hospital’s and, at the
Board’s option, each health network’s proposed budget based on the
information provided pursuant to this subchapter and in accordance with a
schedule established by the Board.
(2) The Board may, at its discretion and in the interest of controlling
health system costs, establish methodologies for reviewing each hospital’s or
health network’s budgets based on revenue, based on costs, or based on the
setting of a global budget for the hospital or health network.
(3) Pursuant to its rate setting authority under section 9376 of this title,
the Board may establish reference-based pricing for hospitals or health
networks, or both. Any such reference-based pricing may apply with respect
to all public and private payers, to the extent permitted under federal law, or to
one or more payer segments, such as State employees, municipal employees,
or school employees, or a combination of these. The Board may determine a
transition period for implementation of reference-based pricing to permit
appropriate reductions, as determined by the Board, in hospital or health
network costs to accompany implementation.
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 7 of 15
(b) In conjunction with budget reviews, the Board shall:
(1) review utilization information;
(2) consider the Health Resource Allocation Plan identifying Vermont’s
critical health needs, goods, services, and resources developed pursuant to
section 9405 of this title;
(3) consider the expenditure analysis for the previous year and the
proposed expenditure analysis for the year under review;
(4) consider any reports from professional review organizations;
(5) solicit public comment on all aspects of hospital or health network
costs and use and on the budgets proposed by individual hospitals and health
networks;
(6) meet with hospitals and health networks to review and discuss
hospital budgets for the forthcoming fiscal year;
(7) give public notice of the meetings with hospitals and health
networks, and invite the public to attend and to comment on the proposed
budgets;
(8) consider the extent to which costs incurred by the hospital or health
network in connection with services provided to Medicaid beneficiaries are
being charged to non-Medicaid health benefit plans and other non-Medicaid
payers;
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 8 of 15
(9) require each hospital to file an analysis that reflects a reduction in
net revenue needs from non-Medicaid payers equal to any anticipated increase
in Medicaid, Medicare, or another public health care program reimbursements,
and to any reduction in bad debt or charity care due to an increase in the
number of insured individuals;
(10) require each hospital and health network to provide information on
administrative costs, as defined by the Board, including specific information
on the amounts spent on marketing and advertising costs;
(11) require each hospital and health network to create or maintain
connectivity to the State’s Health Information Exchange Network in
accordance with the criteria established by the Vermont Information
Technology Leaders, Inc., pursuant to subsection 9352(i) of this title, provided
that the Board shall not require a hospital or health network to create a level of
connectivity that the State’s Exchange is unable to support;
(12) review the hospital’s or health network’s investments in workforce
development initiatives, including nursing workforce pipeline collaborations
with nursing schools and compensation and other support for nurse preceptors;
and
(13) consider the salaries for the hospital’s or health network’s
executive and clinical leadership and the hospital’s or health network’s salary
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 9 of 15
spread, including a comparison of median salaries to the medians of northern
New England states.
(c) Individual hospital and health network budgets established under this
section shall:
(1) be consistent with the Health Resource Allocation Plan;
(2) take into consideration national, regional, or in-state peer group
norms, according to indicators, ratios, and statistics established by the Board;
(3) promote efficient and economic operation of the hospital;
(4) reflect budget performances for prior years;
(5) include a finding that the analysis provided in subdivision (b)(9) of
this section is a reasonable methodology for reflecting a reduction in net
revenues for non-Medicaid payers reasonable reduction in commercial payer
rates to reflect actual and anticipated increases in reimbursements from
Medicaid, Medicare, and other public health care assistance programs; and
(6) demonstrate that they support equal access to appropriate mental
health care that meets standards of quality, access, and affordability equivalent
to other components of health care as part of an integrated, holistic system of
care.
(d)(1) Annually, the Board shall establish a budget for each hospital and, at
the Board’s option, for one or more health networks, on or before September
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 10 of 15
15, followed by a written decision by October 1. Each hospital and health
network shall operate within the budget established under this section.
(2)(A) It is the General Assembly’s intent that hospital and health
network cost containment conduct is afforded state action immunity under
applicable federal and State antitrust laws, if:
(i) the Board requires or authorizes the conduct in any hospital or
health network budget established by the Board under this section;
(ii) the conduct is in accordance with standards and procedures
prescribed by the Board; and
(iii) the conduct is actively supervised by the Board.
(B) A hospital’s or health network’s violation of the Board’s
standards and procedures shall be subject to enforcement pursuant to
subsection (h) of this section.
(3)(A) The Office of the Health Care Advocate shall have the right to
receive copies of all materials related to the hospital and health network budget
review and may:
(i) ask questions of employees of the Green Mountain Care Board
related to the Board’s hospital or health network budget review;
(ii) submit written questions to the Board that the Board will ask
of hospitals and health networks in advance of any hearing held in conjunction
with the Board’s hospital or health network review:;
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 11 of 15
(iii) submit written comments for the Board’s consideration; and
(iv) ask questions and provide testimony in any hearing held in
conjunction with the Board’s hospital or health network budget review.
(B) The Office of the Health Care Advocate shall not further disclose
any confidential or proprietary information provided to the Office pursuant to
this subdivision (3).
(4) The Board may adopt rules to incorporate certificate of need
determinations into the budget review process of a hospital or health network.
The rules shall retain the jurisdictional thresholds and required criteria set forth
in subchapter 5 of this chapter but may provide for a streamlined process that
reduces costs for the Board or the applicant, or both.
(e) The Board may establish a process to define, on an annual basis, criteria
for hospitals and health networks to meet, such as utilization and inflation
benchmarks. The Board may waive one or more of the review processes listed
in subsection (b) of this section.
(f)(1) The Board may, upon application, adjust a budget established under
this section upon a showing of need based upon exceptional or unforeseen
circumstances in accordance with the criteria and processes established under
section 9405 of this title.
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 12 of 15
(2) A hospital or health network shall not increase its rates in response
to a revenue shortfall in the absence of exceptional circumstances, as
determined and approved by the Board.
(g) The Board may request, and a hospital or health network shall provide,
information determined by the Board to be necessary to determine whether the
hospital or health network is operating within a budget established under this
section. For purposes of this subsection, subsection (h) of this section, and
subdivision 9454(a)(7) of this title, the Board’s authority shall extend to an
affiliated corporation or other person in the control of or controlled by the
hospital or health network to the extent that such authority is necessary to carry
out the purposes of this subsection, subsection (h) of this section, or
subdivision 9454(a)(7) of this title. As used in this subsection, a rebuttable
presumption of “control” is created if the entity, hospital, health network, or
other person, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to
vote, or holds proxies representing 20 percent or more of the voting securities
or membership interest or other governing interest of the hospital, health
network, or other controlled entity.
(h)(1) If a hospital or health network violates a provision of this section, the
Board may maintain an action in the Superior Court of the county in which the
hospital is located or the health network is headquartered to enjoin, restrain, or
prevent such violation.
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 13 of 15
(2)(A)(i) After notice and an opportunity for hearing, the Board may
impose on a person who knowingly violates a provision of this subchapter, or a
rule adopted pursuant to this subchapter, a civil an administrative penalty of no
not more than $40,000.00 $400,000.00, or in the case of a continuing violation,
a civil an administrative penalty of no not more than $100,000.00
$1,000,000.00 or one-tenth of one percent of the gross annual revenues of the
hospital or health network, whichever is greater. This subdivision (2)(A)(i)
shall not apply to violations of subsection (d) of this section caused by
exceptional or unforeseen circumstances.
(ii) After notice and an opportunity for hearing, the Board may
order all or a portion of the amount of a penalty imposed pursuant to
subdivision (i) of this subdivision (2)(A) to be withheld from the compensation
of the hospital’s or health network’s executive officer or officers responsible
for the violation and remitted to the Board in partial or complete satisfaction of
the penalty, as applicable.
(B)(i) The Board may order a hospital or health network to:
(I)(aa) cease material violations of this subchapter or of a
regulation or order issued pursuant to this subchapter; or
(bb) cease operating contrary to the budget established for
the hospital or health network under this section, provided such a deviation
from the budget is material; and
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 14 of 15
(II) take such corrective measures as are necessary to remediate
the violation or deviation and to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.
(ii) Orders issued under this subdivision (2)(B) shall be issued
after notice and an opportunity to be heard, except where the Board finds that a
hospital’s or health network’s financial or other emergency circumstances pose
an immediate threat of harm to the public or to the financial condition of the
hospital or health network. Where there is an immediate threat, the Board may
issue orders under this subdivision (2)(B) without written or oral notice to the
hospital or health network. Where an order is issued without notice, the
hospital or health network shall be notified of the right to a hearing at the time
the order is issued. The hearing shall be held within 30 days after receipt of
the hospital’s or health network’s request for a hearing, and a decision shall be
issued within 30 days after conclusion of the hearing. The Board may increase
the time to hold the hearing or to render the decision for good cause shown.
Hospitals and health networks may appeal any decision in this subsection to
Superior Court. Appeal shall be on the record as developed by the Board in
the administrative proceeding and the standard of review shall be as provided
in 8 V.S.A. § 16.
(C)(i) Notwithstanding any provision of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to the
contrary, the Board may establish a process to reduce expenditures for a
hospital or health network that violates its budget order. The process shall
VT LEG #379293 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.245
2025 Page 15 of 15
include notice and an opportunity to be heard and provide an opportunity for
public comment.
(ii) A hospital or health network that seeks to reduce expenditures
for patient services in response to the Board’s budget violation order shall do
so in accordance with a compliance plan approved by the Board.
(3)(A) The Board shall require the officers and directors of a hospital or
health network to file under oath, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the
Board, any information designated by the Board and required pursuant to this
subchapter. The authority granted to the Board under this subsection (h) is in
addition to any other authority granted to the Board under law.
(B) A person who knowingly makes a false statement under oath or
who knowingly submits false information under oath to the Board or to a
hearing officer appointed by the Board or who knowingly testifies falsely in
any proceeding before the Board or a hearing officer appointed by the Board
shall be guilty of perjury and punished as provided in 13 V.S.A. § 2901.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025 and Sec. 3 (amendments to
hospital and health system budget review) shall apply beginning with hospital
fiscal year 2027.
VT LEG #379293 v.2